Washington statutes.
RCW 43.325.005

Findings—2007 c 348.

(1) The legislature finds that excessive dependence on fossil fuels jeopardizes Washington's economic security, environmental integrity, and public health. Accelerated development and use of clean fuels and clean vehicle technologies will reduce the drain on Washington's economy from importing fossil fuels. As fossil fuel prices rise, clean fuels and vehicles can save consumers money while promoting the development of a major, sustainable industry that provides good jobs and a new source of rural prosperity. In addition, clean fuels and vehicles protect public health by reducing toxic air and climate change emissions.

(2) The legislature also finds that climate change is expected to have significant impacts in the Pacific Northwest region in the near and long-term future. These impacts include: Increased temperatures, declining snowpack, more frequent heavy rainfall and flooding, receding glaciers, rising sea levels, increased risks to public health due to insect and rodent-borne diseases, declining salmon populations, and increased drought and risk of forest fires. The legislature recognizes the need at this time to continue to gather and analyze information related to climate protection. This analysis will allow prudent steps to be taken to avoid, mitigate, or respond to climate impacts and protect our communities.

(3) Finally, the legislature finds that to reduce fossil fuel dependence, build our clean energy economy, and reduce climate impacts, the state should develop policies and incentives that help businesses, consumers, and farmers gain greater access to affordable clean fuels and vehicles and to produce clean fuels in the state. These policies and incentives should include: Incentives for replacement of the most polluting diesel engines, especially in school buses; transitional incentives for development of the most promising in-state clean fuels and fuel feedstocks, including biodiesel crops, ethanol from plant waste, and liquid natural gas from landfill or wastewater treatment gases; reduced fossil fuel consumption by state fleets; development of promising new technologies for displacing petroleum with electricity, such as "plug-in hybrids"; and impact analysis and emission accounting procedures that prepare Washington to respond and prosper as climate change impacts occur, and as policies and markets to reduce climate pollution are developed.

[ 2007 c 348 s 1.]